th: สไตล์การตีกลองโกเบลต์: มือหรือไม้ (ใช้ได้สองแบบ); ใช้มือเล่น; รองรับไม้/ไม้ตี; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Goblet būgno grojimo stilius: Rankomis arba lazdele (dvigubas naudojimas); Grojama rankomis; Tinka groti lazdele / muštuku; Kita
hu: Serlegdob játékstílus: Kéz vagy ütő (kettős használat); Kézzel játszott; Ütővel/verővel kompatibilis; Egyéb
nl: Goblet drum speelstijl: Hand of stok (dubbel gebruik); Met de hand bespeeld; Geschikt voor stok/mallet (klopper); Anders
sk-SK: Štýl hry na pohárový bubon: Rukou alebo paličkou (dvojité použitie); Hrané rukami; Kompatibilné s paličkami; Iné
fi: Darbukarummun soittotyyli: Käsi tai kapula (kaksikäyttöinen); Käsin soitettava; Kapula-/nuijayhteensopiva; Muu
bg-BG: Стил на свирене на дарбука: С ръце или с палки (двойна употреба); С ръце; Съвместим с палки; Друго
es: Estilo de ejecución del tambor de copa: Mano o baqueta (doble uso); Tocado con la mano; Compatible con baqueta/mazo; Otro
pl: Styl gry na bębnie kielichowym: Dłonią lub pałką (podwójne zastosowanie); Dłonią; Kompatybilny z pałkami/bijakami; Inny
sl-SI: Način igranja na čašasti boben: Z roko ali palčko (dvojna uporaba); Igran z rokami; Združljivo s palčko/tolkačem; Drugo
sv: Spelstil för bägartrumma: Hand eller stock (dubbel användning); Handspelad; Kompatibel med stock/klubba; Annan
pt-PT: estilo de tocar tambor de cálice: Mão ou baqueta (dupla utilização); Tocado à mão; Compatível com baqueta/maço; Outro
it: Stile di esecuzione del tamburo a calice: A mano o con bacchetta (doppio uso); A mano; Compatibile con bacchette/mazzette; Altro
ru: Стиль игры на дарбуке: Руки или палочки (двойного назначения); Для игры руками; Совместимо с палочками/колотушками; Другое
en: Goblet drum playing style: Hand or stick (dual use); Hand-played; Stick/mallet compatible; Other
nb: Spillestil for trommekopper: Hånd eller stikke (dobbel bruk); Håndspilt; Kompatibel med stikke/kølle; Annet
ko: 고블릿 드럼 연주 방식: 손 또는 스틱(겸용); 손 연주; 스틱/말렛 호환; 기타
tr: Darbuka çalma stili: El veya baget (çift kullanım); Elle çalınan; Baget/tokmak uyumlu; Diğer
vi: Kiểu chơi trống cốc: Tay hoặc dùi (chức năng kép); Chơi bằng tay; Tương thích với dùi/cùi chỏ; Khác
ja: ゴブレットドラムの演奏スタイル: 手またはスティック (両用); 手打ち; スティック/マレット対応; その他
fr: Style de jeu du tambour en gobelet: Main ou baguette (double usage); Joué à la main; Compatible avec baguette/maillet; Autre
zh-CN: 高脚杯鼓演奏方式: 手或鼓槌（双用）; 手击; 兼容鼓棒/鼓槌; 其他
el: Στυλ παιξίματος τυμπάνου Goblet: Με χέρι ή μπαγκέτα (διπλής χρήσης); Με τα χέρια; Συμβατό με μπαγκέτα/κόπανο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Stil sviranja peharnog bubnja: Ruka ili palica (dvostruka upotreba); Sviranje rukama; Kompatibilno s palicom / batićem; Ostalo
cs: Styl hry na pohárový buben: Ruce nebo palička (dvojí použití); Hrané rukama; Kompatibilní s paličkami; Ostatní
de: Spielstil der Goblet Drum: Hand oder Schlägel (beides möglich); Mit der Hand gespielt; Kompatibel mit Schlägeln; Andere
ro-RO: Stilul de interpretare pe tobe goblet: Cu mâna sau cu bețe (utilizare dublă); Interpretat cu mâinile; Compatibil cu bețe/ciocănele; Altele
pt-BR: Estilo de execução do tambor de taça: Mão ou baqueta (uso duplo); Tocado com as mãos; Compatível com baqueta/maçaneta; Outro
da: Spillestil for bægertromme: Hånd eller stikke (kombineret brug); Håndspillet; Kompatibel med stikke/kølle; Anden
zh-TW: 高腳杯鼓演奏方式: 雙手或鼓棒 (兩用); 雙手敲擊; 適用鼓棒/琴槌; 其他